Georgia, session 2025_26, HB511.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
income tax imposition, rate, computation, exemptions, and credits, is amended by adding a
new Code section to read as follows:
"48-7-28.5.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Catastrophe savings account' means a regular savings account or money market
account established by a resident taxpayer to pay for qualified catastrophe expenses.
H. B. 511 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 50 1210S
(2) 'Catastrophic event' means windstorms, cyclones, earthquakes, hurricanes, ice storms,
tornadoes, high winds, floods, hail storms, and any other weather events or occurrences,
provided that such event or occurrence has been declared as a disaster or emergency by
the Governor.
(3) 'Qualified catastrophe expenses' means:
(A) A qualified deductible paid for damage resulting from a catastrophic event; and
(B) Expenses incurred in repairing or replacing damage to a taxpayer's primary
residence as a result of a catastrophic event that are not covered by a homeowner's
insurance policy.
(4) 'Qualified deductible' means the deductible for the homeowner's insurance policy of
the taxpayer covering catastrophic event damage for his or her primary residence. If such
policy provides for more than one deductible, the deductible with the highest amount
shall constitute the qualified deductible.
(b) A taxpayer may establish one catastrophe savings account pursuant to this Code
section which shall be labeled as a catastrophe savings account and shall specify that the
purpose of the account is to cover qualified catastrophe expenses. No more than one
catastrophe savings account pursuant to this Code section shall be established for a primary
residence.
(c)(1) For a taxpayer whose qualified deductible is $1,000.00 or less, the total amount
that may be contributed to a catastrophe savings account shall not exceed $2,000.00.
(2) For a taxpayer whose qualified deductible is greater than $1,000.00, the total amount
that may be contributed to a catastrophe savings account shall not exceed the lesser of
twice the amount of the taxpayer's qualified deductible or $25,000.00.
(3) For a self-insured taxpayer who chooses not to obtain insurance on his or her primary
residence, the total amount that may be contributed to a catastrophe savings account shall
not exceed $250,000.00; provided, however, that in no case shall the amount contributed
H. B. 511 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 50 1210S
to the catastrophe savings account exceed the fair market value of the taxpayer's primary
residence.
(d)(1) An individual taxpayer shall be allowed a deduction from the tax imposed
pursuant to this article for amounts contributed to a catastrophe savings account in
accordance with this Code section.
(2) All interest income earned by a catastrophe savings account in compliance with this
Code section shall be exempt from the tax imposed pursuant this article.
(3) A distribution from a catastrophe savings account shall be included in the income of
the taxpayer unless the amount of the distribution is used to cover qualified catastrophe
expenses; provided, however, that no such amount shall be included in the income of the
taxpayer if the qualified catastrophe expenses of the taxpayer during the taxable year are
equal to or greater than the aggregate distributions from such account during the taxable
year. If the aggregate distributions during the taxable year from such account exceed the
qualified catastrophe expenses of the taxpayer during the taxable year, the amount
otherwise included in the taxpayer's income shall be reduced by the amount of the
distributions for qualified catastrophe expenses and the amount of interest income earned
by the catastrophe savings account.
(e)(1) If a taxpayer contributes in excess of the limits provided in this Code section and
claimed a deduction pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section, the taxpayer shall
withdraw the amount of the excess contributions and include that amount in the income
of the taxpayer in the year of withdrawal.
(2) If a taxpayer who owns a catastrophe savings account dies, his or her account shall
be included in the income of the person who receives the account, unless that person is
the surviving spouse of the taxpayer. Upon the death of such a surviving spouse, the
amount in the account shall be included in the income of the person who receives the
account.
H. B. 511 (SUB)
- 3 -

LC 50 1210S
(f) The department shall promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to implement and
administer the provisions of this Code section."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall be applicable to taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 511 (SUB)
- 4 -